West Virginia, session 2025, HB3270.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2A.  COMPENSATION FOR AND EXPENSES OF MEMBERS OF THE LEGISLATURE. §4-2A-5a. Drug testing of legislators. (a) The Legislature finds and declares that members of the Legislature, as public figures, have a reduced expectation of privacy and that the job responsibilities of legislators greatly impact public safety. As a result, establishing a requirement for members of the Legislature to be drug free is a reasonable government function.(b) Notwithstanding any provisions of this code to the contrary, no member of the Legislature may receive any compensation or expense reimbursement pursuant to this article until he or she successfully passes a drug test for all known illegal drugs and any legal drugs for which he or she does not have a prescription. The test shall be conducted annually by December 31.  Failure to pass or take a drug test pursuant to this section precludes that legislator from receiving any compensation or expense reimbursement for any legislative session or activity in which he or she would otherwise be authorized to receive compensation or reimbursement under this article. Each legislator shall pay the cost of his or her drug test.